Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-142
Department or agency; file report with clerk.

The department or an agency which receives information as provided in section 43-138 shall file a written report with the clerk of the court within nine months of receipt of the information. The report shall indicate whether the relative has been located and whether a contact between the relative and the adopted person has been arranged or has occurred. If the relative has not been located, the report shall set forth the efforts made to identify and locate the relative.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 24;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 39;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 87.